src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/pronouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Pronouns

Tests:
  Pronoun - mån: # Personal
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: mån
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: muv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: muv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom+Long: månnå
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen+Long: muvva
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc+Long: muvva
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ine: mujna
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: munji
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela: mujsta
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Com: mujna
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Gen: munnu
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom: måj
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom+Long: mådja
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: munnuv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ine: munnun
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ill: munnuj
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ela: munnus
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Com: munnujn
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: [mij, midja]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen: [mijá, mijáj]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: [mijáv, mijájt]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ine: [miján, mijájn]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: [midjij, midjijda, mijájda]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ela: [mijás, mijájs]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: [mijáj, mijájn]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abe: [muvdá, muvda, muvdak, muvdagi, muvdagá]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: dån
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: duv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: duv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom+Long: dådnå
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen+Long: duvva
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc+Long: duvva
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ine: dujna
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ill: dunji
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ela: dujsta
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com: dujna
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Gen: dunnu
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom+Long: dåj
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom+Long: dådja
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Acc: dunnuv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ine: dunnun
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ill: dunnuj
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ela: dunnus
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Com: dunnujn
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: [dij, didja]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen: [dijá, dijáj]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: [dijáv, dijájt]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ine: [diján, dijájn]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ill: [didjij, didjijda, dijájda]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ela: [dijás, dijájs]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Com: [dijáj, dijájn]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abe: [duvdá, duvda, duvdagi, duvdak, duvdagá]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abe: [dijáda, dijájdagi, dijájdak, dijájdagá, dijájda, dijádak, dijádagi, dijádagá]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: sån
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: suv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: suv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Long: sådnå
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Long: suvva
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Long: suvva    
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: sujna
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: sunji
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: sujsta
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: sujna
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Gen: sunnu
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Nom: såj
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Nom+Long: sådja
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Acc: sunnuv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Ine: sunnun
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Ill: sunnuj
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Ela: sunnus
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Com: sunnujn
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: [sij, sidja]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: [sijá, sijáj]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: [sijáv, sijájt]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine: [siján, sijájn]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: [sidjij, sidjijda, sijájda]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: [sijás, sijájs]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: [sijáj, sijájn]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Abe: [sunnuda, sunnudak, sunnudagá, sunnudagi]
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: dat
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Long: dahta]
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: dan
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: dav
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Long: davva
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: [danna, danne]
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: dasi
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: [dassta, dasste]
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: dajna
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: da
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: daj
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: dajt
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine: dajn
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: dajda
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: dajs
#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela+Long: [dajsta, dajste]

#    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: daj

  Pronoun - dat: # demonstrative
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dat
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom+Long: dahta
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dan
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dav
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc+Long: davva
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: [danna, danne]
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dasi
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: [dassta, dasste]
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dajna
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: da
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom+Long: daha
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: daj
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dajt
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dajn
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dajda
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dajs
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela+Long: [dajste, dajsta]
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: daj

  Pronoun - dát: # demonstrative
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dát
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom+Long: dáhta
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dán
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dáv
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc+Long: dávva
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: [dánna, dánne]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dási
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: [dássta, dásste]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dájna
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dá
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom+Long: dáha
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: dáj
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dájt
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dájn
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dájda
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dájs
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela+Long: [dájste, dájsta]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: dáj

  Pronoun - dáhtak: # demonstrative
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-k: dáhtak
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom+Foc/Pos-k: dáhtak
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k: [dáŋga, dáŋgas]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k: [dáŋga, dáŋgas]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-k: dávga
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc+Foc/Pos-k: dávga
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine+Foc/Neg-k: dánnága
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine+Foc/Pos-k: dánnága
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-k: dásiga
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill+Foc/Pos-k: dásiga
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela+Foc/Neg-k: dástága
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela+Foc/Pos-k: dástága
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-k: dájnak
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com+Foc/Pos-k: dájnak
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Par+Foc/Neg-k: dátga
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Par+Foc/Pos-k: dátga

  Pronoun - dakkir: # dakkárcase
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dakkir
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dakkira
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dakkirav
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: dakkirin
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dakkirij
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: dakkiris
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dakkirijn
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dakkira
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: dakkirij
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dakkirijt
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dakkirijn
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dakkirijda
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dakkirijs
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: dakkirij
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Ess: dakkirin

  Pronoun - dakkárasj: # dakkárcase
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dakkárasj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dakkárattja
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dakkárattjav
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: dakkárattjan
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: [dakkáradtjaj, dakkárattjaj]
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: dakkárattjas
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dakkárattjajn
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dakkárattja
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: dakkárattjaj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dakkárattjajt
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dakkárattjajn
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dakkárattjajda
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dakkárattjajs
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: dakkárattjaj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Ess: dakkáradtjan

  Pronoun - iesj: # reflexive the plural is added
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom: iesj
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom: ietja
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom: ietja
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ietjam, iehtjam]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ietjat
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ietjas
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [iehtjama, iehtjame]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: [ietjajma, ietjajme]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: [ietjada, ietjade]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ietjajda
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ietjaska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ietjajska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: [iehtjama, iehtjame]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ietjajma
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: [ietjada, ietjade]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ietjajda
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ietjasa
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ietjajsa
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: [ietjanam, ietjanim]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: [ietjanit, ietjanat]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: ietjanis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxDu1: ietjanimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+PxDu1: ietjajnimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxDu2: ietjanihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+PxDu2: ietjajnihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxDu3: ietjaniska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+PxDu3: ietjajniska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: ietjanimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: ietjajnimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: ietjanihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: ietjajnihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: ietjanisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: ietjajnisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: [allasim, iehtjasim]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: [allasit, iehtjasit]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: [allasis, iehtjasis]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxDu1: [allasimme, iehtjasimme]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: [allasihtte, iehtjasihtte]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxDu3: [allasiska, iehtjasiska]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [allasimme, iehtjasimme]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: [allasihtte, iehtjasihtte]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: [allasisá, iehtjasisá]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: [ietjastam,ietjastim]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: [ietjastit,ietjastat]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: ietjastis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxDu1: ietjastimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+PxDu1: ietjajstimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxDu2: ietjastihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+PxDu2: ietjajstihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxDu3: ietjastiska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+PxDu3: ietjajstiska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: ietjastimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: ietjajstimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: ietjastihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: ietjajstihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: ietjastisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: ietjajstisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [ietjajnam, ietjajnim]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxSg2: [ietjajnit, ietjajnat]
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Com+PxSg3: ietjajnis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+PxDu1: ietjajnimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+PxDu2: ietjajnihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+PxDu3: ietjajniska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+PxPl1: ietjajnimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+PxPl2: ietjajnihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+PxPl3: ietjajnisá

  Pronoun - mij: # Relative
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: mij
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: man
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: mav
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Long: mavva
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine: manna
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: [masi, masás, masá]
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela: massta
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: [majna, majnas]
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: ma
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+Long: [maha, mahá]

    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: maj
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: [majt, mejt]
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine: majn
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine+Long: majna
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: [majda, mejda]
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela: majs
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela+Long: majsta
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: maj
    mij+Pron+Rel+Ess: [manen, mannas, manna]

  Pronoun - gut: # Relative
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Sh: gut
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: guhti
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: gen
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: gev
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Long: gevva
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine: [gænna, gänna, gænne, gänne]
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: [gesi, gesá, gesis]
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela: [gæssta, gässta, gæsste, gässte]
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: [gejna, gejnas]
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: gudi
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: gej
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: gejt
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine: gejn
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine+Long: gejna
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: gejda
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela: gejs
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela+Long: gejsta
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: gej
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Ess: guhtin
